Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 5. Collection and Extinguishing of Debts

§ 16-4-501.
Definition.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 123, § 2.

As used in this section and W.S.

16-4-502

, “entity” means a city, town, county, school district, community college district and special taxing district.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 221, § 1; 1987, ch. 123, § 2.

§ 16-4-502.
Collection of debts due a governmental entity; discharge of uncollectible debts.

The governing body of any governmental entity may authorize the use of the services of a collection agency licensed in Wyoming to assist in the collection of debts due the governmental entity.

Any debt due and owing to a governmental entity, which is determined to be uncollectible, shall be certified to the governing body of the entity by the chief administrative officer of the entity to which the debt is due. The certification shall include:

The name and last known address of the debtor;

The goods or services for which the debt was incurred;

The amount of the debt and the date when the debt became due and payable; and

An explanation of what actions have been taken to collect the debt and why the debt has remained unpaid.

The governing body to which uncollectible debts are certified shall review the debts and verify to the satisfaction of the governing body that the debtor has no financial means or assets from which the debt may be satisfied. If the governing body determines a debt is uncollectible, it shall direct that the debt be discharged and extinguished as an account receivable or asset of the governmental entity for which the governing body acts.

The facts and actions which are the basis for the decision that the debt is uncollectible shall be documented in writing and shall be maintained as required under W.S.

9-2-410

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 221, § 1; 1987, ch. 123, § 1.